Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.200

[Art. 21b] Confinement instead of fine.

In the organized militia not in federal service, a court-martial may, instead of imposing a fine, sentence to confinement for not more than one day for each dollar of the authorized fine.

[ 1989 c 48 s 21; 1963 c 220 s 23.]